fr: Type d’installation: Structure métallique pliable; Gonflable; Système de connecteurs modulaires; Assemblage d'arceaux/armature; Pop-up; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de montagem: Estrutura de arame dobrável; Inflável; Sistema de conectores modulares; Montagem de vareta/armação; Pop-up; Outro
pl: Typ rozstawiania: Składany stelaż z drutu; Nadmuchiwany; Modułowy system łączników; Konstrukcja na słupkach/stelażu; Pop-up; Inne
ja: 設置タイプ: 折りたたみ式ワイヤーフレーム; インフレータブル; モジュラーコネクターシステム; ポール/フレームアセンブリ; ポップアップ; その他
zh-TW: 搭建類型: 可折疊鋼絲框架; 充氣式; 模組化連接系統; 營柱/框架組裝; 彈出式; 其他
tr: Kurulum tipi: Katlanabilir tel iskelet; Şişirilebilir; Modüler bağlayıcı sistemi; Direk/iskelet montajı; Pop-up; Diğer
hu: Felállítás típusa: Összecsukható drótvázas; Felfújható; Moduláris csatlakozórendszer; Rudas / Vázas összeszerelés; Pop-up; Egyéb
th: ประเภทการติดตั้ง: โครงลวดพับได้; เป่าลม; ระบบข้อต่อโมดูลาร์; ประกอบเสา/โครง; ป๊อปอัพ; อื่นๆ
da: Opsætningstype: Sammenklappelig trådramme; Oppustelig; Modulært samlesystem; Montering med stænger/ramme; Pop op; Andet
ro-RO: Tipul de montare: Cadru din sârmă pliabil; Gonflabil; Sistem de conectori modulari; Ansamblu stâlpi/cadru; Pop-up; Altele
sv: Typ av montering: Hopfällbar ståltrådsram; Uppblåsbar; Modulärt anslutningssystem; Stång-/rammontering; Popup; Övrigt
el: Τύπος διαμόρφωσης: Πτυσσόμενος συρμάτινος σκελετός; Φουσκωτό; Αρθρωτό σύστημα σύνδεσης; Συναρμολόγηση με μπανέλες/σκελετό; Pop-up; Άλλο
fi: Pystytystapa: Taitettava rautalankakehikko; Ilmatäytteinen; Modulaarinen liitosjärjestelmä; Kaari-/runkokokoonpano; Pop-up; Muu
zh-CN: 组装类型: 折叠钢丝骨架; 充气式; 模块化连接器系统; 撑杆/框架组装; 弹出式; 其他
nb: Oppsettstype: Sammenleggbar trådramme; Oppblåsbar; Modulært koblingssystem; Stang-/rammemontering; Pop-up; Annet
it: Tipo di configurazione: Telaio in filo pieghevole; Gonfiabile; Sistema di connettori modulari; Assemblaggio paleria/telaio; Pop-up; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de configuração: Estrutura de arame dobrável; Insuflável; Sistema de conector modular; Montagem de vareta/estrutura; Pop-up; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta postavitve: Zložljiv žičnat okvir; Napihljivo; Modularni sistem povezovanja; Sklop palic/okvirja; Pop-up; Drugo
sk-SK: Typ nastavenia: Skladací drôtený rám; Nafukovacie; Modulárny spojovací systém; Montáž pomocou tyčí/rámu; Pop-up; Iné
hr-HR: Tip postavljanja: Sklopivi žičani okvir; Na napuhavanje; Modularni sustav spajanja; Sastavljanje pomoću šipki/okvira; Pop-up; Ostalo
ru: Тип установки: Складной проволочный каркас; Надувной; Модульная система соединений; Сборный каркас/дуги; Самораскладывающийся (Pop-up); Другое
ko: 설치 유형: 접이식 와이어 프레임; 팽창식; 모듈형 커넥터 시스템; 폴/프레임 조립; 팝업; 기타
cs: Typ nastavení: Skládací drátěný rám; Nafukovací; Modulární spojovací systém; Sestavení tyčí/rámu; Pop-up (samorozkládací); Jiné
es: Tipo de configuración: Estructura de alambre plegable; Inflable; Sistema de conector modular; Ensamblaje de poste/marco; Pop-up; Otro
vi: Loại thiết lập: Khung dây có thể gập lại; Bơm hơi; Hệ thống đầu nối mô-đun; Lắp ráp cọc/khung; Tự bung; Khác
lt-LT: Surinkimo tipas: Sulankstomas vielos rėmas; Pripučiamas; Modulinė jungčių sistema; Lankų / rėmo surinkimas; Išskleidžiamas (Pop-up); Kita
bg-BG: Тип сглобяване: Сгъваема телена рамка; Надуваем; Модулна система за свързване; Сглобяване с рейки/рамка; Pop-up; Друго
en: Setup type: Foldable wire frame; Inflatable; Modular connector system; Pole/frame assembly; Pop-up; Other
nl: Opzettype: Opvouwbaar draadframe; Opblaasbaar; Modulair connectorsysteem; Stokken-/frameconstructie; Pop-up; Overig
de: Aufbauart: Faltbarer Drahtrahmen; Aufblasbar; Modulares Stecksystem; Gestängeaufbau; Pop-up; Andere